Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.220

Order of taking challenges.

The challenges of either party shall be taken separately in the following order, including in each challenge all the causes of challenge belonging to the same class:

(1) Challenges for cause.

(2) Peremptory challenges.

[ 2003 c 406 s 10; Code 1881 s 216; 1877 p 45 s 220; 1869 p 53 s 220; RRS s 334.]